Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB109.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 27 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 43ISSUANCE OF PERMITS IN ENVIRONMENTAL JUSTICE AREASSec.4301. Legislative findings and purpose.4302. Definitions.4303. Designation of environmental justice areas.4304. Permit process.4305. Regulations and publication.123456789101112131415 § 4301. Legislative findings and purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares that:(1) Low-income, low-wealth communities and communities of color have historically borne and currently bear a disproportionate share of environmental degradation.(2) The Department of Environmental Protection is the agency charged with administering the laws and regulations in this Commonwealth to prevent and remedy environmental degradation and is one of the agencies charged with conserving, maintaining and restoring this Commonwealth's public natural resources.(3) Section 27 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania recognizes that all the people of this Commonwealth have inalienable environmental rights and that the Commonwealth is the trustee of this Commonwealth's public natural resources.(4) All individuals in this Commonwealth should be able to live in and enjoy a clean and healthy environment that includes outdoor spaces, access to clean energy resources, access to public lands and public natural resources.(5) The elimination and restoration of disproportionate environmental degradation is recognized as being directly related to the economic vitality of this Commonwealth.§ 4302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Cumulative environmental impacts." The totality of existing and imminent environmental AND PUBLIC HEALTH impacts and OF pollution in a defined geographic area, to INCLUDING POLLUTION 20250HB0109PN1281 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 OF land, waters of this Commonwealth or ambient air, and regardless of whether the pollution has been authorized under the laws of this Commonwealth."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Environmental justice area." A geographic area characterized by increased pollution burden and vulnerable populations based on demographic, economic, health and environmental data."Facility." The site of a department-regulated activity that may lead to significant public concern due to potential impacts on human health and the environment. The term includes sites that involve the following:(1) National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permits at industrial wastewater facilities that discharge at or above 50,000 gallons per day.(2) Air permits for any new major source of hazardous air pollutants or criteria pollutants.(3) Air permits for any major modification of a major source that are subject to Prevention of Significant Deterioration or Nonattainment New Source Review.(2) AIR PERMITS FOR ANY MAJOR STATIONARY SOURCE OF ANY:(I) VOLATILE ORGANIC COMPOUND;(II) POLLUTANT REGULATED UNDER 42 U.S.C. § 7411 (RELATING TO STANDARDS OF PERFORMANCE FOR NEW STATIONARY SOURCES) OR 7412 (RELATING TO HAZARDOUS AIR POLLUTANTS); OR(III) POLLUTANT FOR WHICH A NATIONAL PRIMARY AMBIENT AIR QUALITY STANDARD HAS BEEN PROMULGATED.(4) (3) Waste permits involving a combined monthly 20250HB0109PN1281 - 3 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 volume in excess of 25 tons, or any major modification of waste permits, including changes that result in an increase in capacity or a facility expansion, for landfills, commercial hazardous waste treatment facilities, storage or disposal facilities and other disposal facilities, including a landfill that accepts ash, construction or demolition debris, medical waste or solid waste, transfer stations, recycling centers, commercial incinerators and other waste processing facilities.(5) (4) Mining permits for bituminous and anthracite underground mines, bituminous and anthracite surface mines, large industrial mineral surface and underground mines, coal refuse disposal, coal refuse reprocessing, large coal preparation facility or any revision of permits under this paragraph that involve additional acreage for mineral removal or use of biosolids for reclamation.(6) (5) An individual permit for a land application of biosolids.(7) (6) Concentrated animal feeding operations that are new or expanded operations of greater than 1,000 animal equivalent units, concentrated animal operation of greater than 300 animal equivalent units in a special protection watershed or a concentrated animal operation with direct discharge to surface waters.(8) (7) An electric generating facility with a capacity of more than 10 NINE megawatts. (9) (8) A sewage treatment plant with a capacity of more than 50,000,000 gallons per day.(10) (9) Underground injection control wells associated with oil and gas development.20250HB0109PN1281 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (11) (10) Other facilities as designated by the Environmental Quality Board through regulations under this chapter."Permit." A permit, approval of coverage under a general permit, registration or other authorization issued by the department establishing the regulatory and management requirements for a regulated activity as authorized by Federal or State law.§ 4303. Designation of environmental justice areas.(a) Method.--The methods to identify an environmental justice area shall be determined and regularly reviewed by the department.(b) Designation.--No later than 120 days after the effective date of this section, the department shall designate and make publicly available environmental justice areas in this Commonwealth. The department shall update environmental justice area designations every three years.§ 4304. Permit process.(a) Department action on permit applications for facilities in environmental justice areas.--Beginning 180 days after the effective date of this section, prior to the department taking an action on an application for a new facility or for the expansion of an existing facility, located in whole or in part in an environmental justice area:(1) The permit applicant shall prepare and submit with the application for facility permit or other authorization, a cumulative environmental impact report assessing the environmental impact of the proposed new facility or expansion of an existing facility, together with the cumulative impacts on the environmental justice area, and the 20250HB0109PN1281 - 5 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adverse environmental effects that cannot be avoided or mitigated should the permit be granted.(2) Unless a public hearing is otherwise required by the environmental laws and regulations for the permit or authorization, the following shall apply:(i) The department shall organize and conduct a public hearing in a location as convenient as possible to all interested parties and publish public notices of the hearing in at least two newspapers circulating within the environmental justice area and on the department's publicly accessible Internet website not less than 21 days prior to the hearing.(ii) At least 14 days prior to the date set for the hearing, a copy of the public notice shall be sent to the clerk of the municipality in which the environmental justice area is located.(iii) At a public hearing, the permit applicant shall provide clear, accurate and complete information about the proposed new facility or expansion of an existing facility and the potential environmental and health impacts of the new or expanded facility. The hearing shall provide an opportunity for meaningful public participation by residents of the environmental justice area.(iv) Following the public hearing, the department shall consider the testimony presented and evaluate revisions or conditions to the permit that may be necessary to reduce the adverse impact to the public health or the environment in the environmental justice area.20250HB0109PN1281 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Decision by department.--The department may not issue a decision on the permit application until at least 60 days after a public hearing.(c) Additional requirements.--The department may require additional conditions or mitigation measures or may deny a permit application in an environmental justice area based on the cumulative environmental impacts.(d) Publication.--The applicant shall provide copies of applications for a permit for a facility located in whole or in part in an environmental justice area to the clerk of the municipality in which the environmental justice area is located, who may recommend to the department conditions upon, revisions to or disapproval of the permit only if specific cause is identified. If the department overrides a municipal recommendation, the department shall be required to transmit notice of the department's justification for overriding the municipality's recommendations to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. If the department does not receive comments within 60 days of receipt of the applications from the permit applicant by the clerk of the municipality, the municipality shall be deemed to have waived the municipality's right to review.(e) Construction.--The provisions of this section shall be in addition to all requirements under any applicable environmental law.§ 4305. Regulations and publication.(a) Promulgation.--The department and Environmental Quality Board shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement this chapter.20250HB0109PN1281 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Publication of permits.--In addition to publication requirements under law and regulation, the department shall publish all permits granted under this chapter, along with any guidance documents, on its publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0109PN1281 - 8 - 12345